Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
186

TREE FARMS

Section

186-1 Definitions

186-2 Eligibility

186-3 Applications; management plans

186-4 Classification; rules

186-5 Agreement with owner

186-5.5 Right to harvest

186-6 Development and maintenance of tree farm
property

186-7 to 10 Repealed

186-11 Additional lands

186-12 Repealed

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next